DEPARTMENT OF STATE International Narcotics Control and Law Enforcement Migration and Refugee Assistance Emergency Refugee and Migration Assistance Fund Nonproliferation, Anti-Terrorism, Demining, and Related Programs This page intentionally left blank.
International Narcotics Control and Law Enforcement ($ in thousands) Account INC National Interests: Drugs and transnational crime pose a unique threat to the long-term security of the United States and are among the two most important sources of global instability in the post-Cold War era.
Unlike other foreign policy interests that may challenge either domestic or external interests, drugs and transnational crime simultaneously target both.
Through their power to corrupt and subvert, they have the capacity to erode U.S. social and economic structures.
Within the State Department, the Bureau of International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs (INL) has broad responsibility for federal law enforcement policy and program coordination in the international arena.
Domestically, illicit drug use directly or indirectly causes the death of 52,000 Americans and costs our society $110 billion a year ­ and that is without taking into account the lives wasted or destroyed by addiction.
And it threatens to claim a new generation.
Surveys have shown an alarming increase since 1992 in the number of American teens using drugs.
Heroin is staging a comeback among young people ignorant of the epidemic of the 1960s and '70s.
Domestic prevention and enforcement alone cannot cope with the avalanche of drugs entering the U.S.; they must be supported by effective control in the source and transit countries.
President Bush has pledged to work with producing nations to eliminate the sources of drugs at their root.
To do this, we will double the funding of $150 million over five years for alternate crop development efforts in Bolivia, Peru and Ecuador, and provide an additional $15 million over five years for crop substitution programs in Southwest Asia.
The same need for international efforts is true of other aspects of global organized crime such as money laundering, credit card fraud, and the traffic in illegal aliens, illegal firearms, and stolen vehicles.
These activities cost the U.S. taxpayer billions of dollars annually by draining capital from U.S. businesses, disrupting the labor market, and putting additional strains on public health, education, and welfare institutions.
International drug trafficking and organized crime are forces that jeopardize the global trend toward peace and freedom, undermine fragile new democracies, sap the strength from developing countries and threaten our efforts to build a safer, more prosperous world.
The administration is answering these national security threats by making international narcotics and crime control top foreign policy priorities.
Our no-nonsense policy is aimed at achieving greater U.S.-led international cooperation focused on the most critical drug and crime targets.
INL's efforts are focussed on reducing drug availability in the U.S. by 50 percent between 1996 and 2007.
In the transnational crime arena, INL will strengthen existing anticrime programs and create new ones for strengthening our borders, ensuring that global criminals have nowhere to hide, attacking international financial and trade crimes, combating corruption, and responding to emerging crime challenges.
FY 2000 Actual 1,322,341 FY 2001 Estimate 324,285 FY 2002 Request 948,000
Within the broad International Affairs Strategic Plan, INL's primary mandates are embodied in two strategic goals under the law enforcement national interest heading: minimize the impact of international crime on the U.S. and its citizens and reduce the entry of illegal drugs into the U.S. Objectives 
With respect to international crime, our programs are designed to: build stronger law enforcement networks to prevent and combat, among other threats, financial crimes and money laundering, alien smuggling and trafficking in women and children, violence against women and children, uncontrolled trafficking in small arms, and intellectual property theft; strengthen efforts by the UN and other international organizations to assist member states to combat international criminal activity; and thwart international crime's ability to undermine democracy and free-market economies in Eastern Europe, Russia and the New Independent States (NIS), and other vulnerable states through strengthening law enforcement and criminal justice systems and anti-corruption initiatives.
Despite the enormity of the task and the challenges ahead, INL's programs are achieving success.
For example: Eradication and alternative development programs in certain source countries are eliminating illicit cultivation of coca at record rates.
In Bolivia, for example, net cultivation of coca for 2000 was down by 33% from the previous year.
In Peru, net cultivation for the year was down 12%, with an overall 70% reduction since 1995;
Our global initiatives to strengthen and better regulate financial institutions are making it easier for authorities to identify and track money laundering and seize the assets of organized crime.
INL has fostered a global network of financial regulators who are trading information daily.
We have funded efforts that have exposed some of the biggest money launderers in the past few years.
Working with foreign banking and regulatory officials, U.S. authorities are confiscating hundreds of millions of dollars in cash and bank accounts from organized crime syndicates ; Agreements were reached with the governments of Ecuador, El Salvador and the Netherlands to establish forward operating locations at Manta, Ecuador, Comalapa International Airport in El Salvador, and in Curacao and Aruba, to support interdiction and detection and monitoring efforts in those important transit areas; A new International Law Enforcement Academy (ILEA) is being established in Gaborone, Botswana.
Like our ILEAs in Budapest and Bangkok, the purpose of our Gaborone ILEA is to strengthen regional law enforcement cooperation and improve participating law enforcement agency performance; and In 2000, INL continued strengthening anticrime coordination with and among European and other major donor countries.
NEW INITIATIVES FOR 2002 The FY 2002 budget request includes funding for two new initiatives: the Andean Counterdrug Initiative and the Southwest Asia Initiative.
ANDEAN COUNTERDRUG INITIATIVE As part of an overall Andean regional initiative, we are requesting $731 million for the Andean Counterdrug Initiative (ACI), a multi-year counterdrug assistance effort designed to sustain and expand programs initially funded by the Plan Colombia emergency supplemental of FY 2000.
While the ACI will be used to sustain programs begun under the supplemental, it differs from Plan Colombia in several respects.
It triples ­ to 45 percent ­ the share of counternarcotics assistance going to countries other than Colombia.
ACI increases to 40 percent the amount of funding going to social and economic programs, exclusive of other economic assistance accounts.
Finally, ACI funding will be augmented from other accounts to support reforms directed toward strengthening democracy and economic growth.
Combined with Plan Colombia, ACI will make a significant, immediate impact on the flow of narcotics out of the Andes.
The goals are to achieve a 30 percent reduction in Colombian coca production between CY 2000 and the end of CY 2002, and to eliminate all illicit coca production in Bolivia by the end of CY 2002.
ACI will support Colombia's push into the former cocagrowing sanctuaries in Putumayo by backing joint operations between the Army's new air mobile counternarcotics brigade and the Colombian National Police's anti-narcotics unit.
It will also support alternative development and assistance to internally displaced persons, maritime and aerial interdiction, the Colombian National Police's aerial eradication program with additional spray aircraft, and human rights and judicial reform in Colombia.
SOUTHWEST ASIA INITIATIVE Southwest Asia produces more opium than any other region in the world.
Large quantities of inexpensive, high quality Afghan heroin are destined for Europe and North America.
The Afghan drug trade is behind rising crime, corruption, drug addiction and HIV infection in Central, Southwest, and South Asia, and is a source of income for organized crime groups stretching across Russia into Europe and the U.S. Pakistan has been very successful in eliminating poppy cultivation from portions of its territory, but there remain pockets of cultivation.
The President is proposing the provision of $15 million over a five-year period for crop control/alternative development programs in Southwest Asia to fight these problems.
The U.S. will develop bilateral programs and participate in multilateral programs through the United Nations Drug Control Program (UNDCP) aimed at ending poppy cultivation in Afghanistan permanently.
U.S. criteria for participation in UNDCP programs include requirements for local authorities to take active counternarcotics measures against the drug trade and to have a verification mechanism to measure compliance with performance benchmarks.
In Pakistan, INL will build on its successful program, targeting cultivation and drug trafficking in the Khyber Agency of the Northwest Frontier Province.
Latin America ($ in thousands) Account Other INC Plan Colombia Andean Counterdrug National Interests: The elimination of the Latin American drug threat is a national security issue.
Counternarcotics programs are essential to strengthening democratic institutions and defending them against an insidious threat that also undermines free market economies, human rights and environmental protection.
In addition, the National Drug Control Strategy has five overarching goals, two of which relate to national interests in this area.
Goal Four is to shield America's air, land and sea frontiers from the drug threat.
Goal Five is to break foreign and domestic sources of supply.
Objectives and Justification: In order to address these national interests and goals, International Narcotics Control and Law Enforcement (INCLE) and Andean Counterdrug Initiative (ACI) funds will support a variety of programs, with the following objectives: reducing drug crop cultivation and the processing and transportation of drugs through a combination of interdiction, eradication and alternative development programs; strengthening Latin American law enforcement and judicial institutions' abilities to investigate and prosecute major trafficking organizations through commodity assistance and training programs; undercutting traffickers' access to their drug proceeds and to financial systems; and increasing international awareness of the drug threat and its consequences to each Latin American country.
In Fiscal Year 2002, $762 million is being requested for the Latin America region to implement the goal to reduce drug availability in the U.S. by 50 percent between 1996 and 2007.
The ACI request is $731 million for Colombia, Peru, Bolivia, Ecuador, Brazil, Venezuela and Panama.
These funds will be used to continue enforcement, border control, crop reduction, alternative development, institution building, and administration of justice and human rights programs for the source countries of Colombia, Peru and Bolivia.
Specifically, for Colombia we are requesting $399 million.
$253 million of these funds will be dedicated to operations and maintenance of air assets provided under Plan Colombia supplemental funding, to Colombia National Police and Colombian Army Counternarcotics Brigade operational support, herbicide, airfield upgrades, base and security upgrades, communications equipment, and riverine and coastal interdiction activities.
FY 2000 Enacted 16,667 1,018,500 0 FY 2001 Estimate 23,357 0 0 FY2002 Request 31,250 0 731,000
The remaining $147 million will be used for alternative development, human rights and administration of justice programs.
The requests for Peru and Bolivia focus on interdiction and border control efforts to preempt spillover from Colombia, and continuation of coca and poppy reduction programs, alternative development and institution building.
We are also requesting similar funding for Ecuador, Brazil, Venezuela and Panama for enhanced border control and interdiction programs, plus alternative development monies for Ecuador.
INCLE funding to shield America's frontiers will target major drug transit routes from Latin America to the U.S., which shift from Mexico/Central America to the countries of the western and eastern Caribbean, depending on trafficking trends.
Enhancing bilateral programs with Mexico is a major priority, due to its role as the leading smuggling gateway to the U.S., growing methamphetamine trafficking and the rise of powerful Mexican trafficking groups within the Latin American cocaine hierarchy.
For all of these countries, the U.S. goal is to provide equipment, technical assistance and training to support the institutionalization of political will, law enforcement and judicial capabilities so that a sustainable effort can be mounted against the drug trafficking organizations that target the U.S.
Asian Regional ($ in thousands) Account INC National Interests: Available intelligence indicates that the flow of heroin and other contraband to the U.S. is increasing while U.S. addiction rates are rising and that Asian heroin accounts for a significant share of the heroin smuggled in to the U.S.
The flow of illicit substances to U.S. shores cannot be stemmed without adequate support for counternarcotics efforts by cooperating governments in a region that covers over half the globe.
Objectives and Justification: While illicit drug production in Southeast Asia has declined due to poor weather and stronger enforcement, three consecutive years of record opium production in Afghanistan have made inexpensive, high quality Afghan heroin available throughout the world.
A relatively new phenomenon is the rapid increase in illicit amphetamine-type stimulant production and trafficking by Southeast Asian organizations that also traffic in heroin.
Drug trafficking continues to proliferate through South and East Asia and into the Middle East and Africa, as local criminal organizations prosper and develop into regional, interregional and global networks.
The transnational character of illicit narcotics trafficking requires a regional approach for multilateral and bilateral programs.
The FY 2002 regional cooperation program is designed to help governments begin establishing counternarcotics law enforcement units, obtain training or equipment, and conduct demand reduction/public awareness campaigns.
The intent is not to establish permanent programs, but to provide seed money for countries to help themselves and to complement UNDCP and other donor programs.
East Asia : The program in East Asia is designed to strengthen countries' law enforcement and judicial institutions and to help them develop the capability to deal with drug abuse by providing training and equipment.
Indonesia, with its weak institutions, has become a transit point as well as destination for illicit narcotics and is a new focus of our counternarcotics and law enforcement enhancement efforts.
Institutional development and material assistance is also needed in China, Vietnam and Cambodia, where drug trafficking and abuse are rapidly growing problems, but whose governments have limited experience and capabilities in confronting these challenges.
The program will also assist countries in developing legislative and judicial structures to deal more effectively with drug trafficking and money laundering.
Small programs to enhance law enforcement and demand reduction capabilities are planned for a variety of countries in the region.
The U.S. will also encourage and enhance existing regional cooperation in addressing narcotics control, including the East Asian regional campaign against amphetamine-type stimulant trafficking.
FY 2000 Enacted 4,798 FY 2001 Estimate 3,328 FY2002 Request 10,500
South Asia : In India, INL works with the government to support a program for an important opium yield survey, to provide law enforcement equipment to monitor the licit opium program, and to fund a small demand reduction programs run by NGOs.
Southwest Asia Initiatives : Southwest Asia produces more opium than any other region in the world.
Large quantities of inexpensive, high quality Afghan heroin are destined for Europe and North America.
The Afghan drug trade is behind rising crime, corruption, drug addiction and HIV infection in Central, Southwest, and South Asia, and is a source of income for organized crime groups stretching across Russia into Europe and the U.S.
The President is proposing the provision of $15 million over a five-year period for crop control/alternative development programs in Southwest Asia to fight these problems.
The U.S. will develop bilateral programs and participate in multilateral programs through the United Nations International Drug Control Program (UNDCP) aimed at ending poppy cultivation in Afghanistan permanently.
U.S. criteria for participation in UNDCP programs include requirements for local authorities to take active counternarcotics measures against the drug trade and to have a verification mechanism to measure compliance with performance benchmarks.
Major Asian Countries ($ in thousands) Account INC National Interests: Heroin remains our narcotics control priority in Laos, Pakistan, and Thailand, which are both producer and transit countries.
Available intelligence indicates that the flow of heroin and other contraband to the United States is increasing while U.S. addiction rates are rising.
Recent intelligence analysis indicates that Asian heroin accounts for a significant share of the heroin smuggled in to the United States.
The flow of illicit substances to U.S. shores cannot be stemmed without adequate support for counternarcotics efforts by cooperating governments in a region that covers over half the globe.
Further, narcotics trafficking has a corrupting effect on both producer and transit countries, threatening to undermine democratic institutions in regions where key U.S. interests exist.
Programs designed to enhance law enforcement activities and improve the rule of law in these countries benefit U.S. national interests by preserving the economic and political stability of allies and trading partners.
Objectives and Justification: While our narcotics control priority in Asia is heroin, the threat to democratic institutions from the growing metamphetamine problem in Thailand means that our assistance there has the dual benefit of curbing heroin trafficking to the U.S. and helping the Thai cope with metamphetamine trafficking.
While USG assistance to Thai alternative development programs has resulted in dramatic reductions in opium poppy cultivation there, Thailand remains a transit country for heroin flowing out of Burma to the U.S.
Our current efforts seek to enhance interdiction activities throughout Southeast Asia.
The proven means of attacking opium poppy cultivation ­ bilateral programs in alternative development combined with strong enforcement ­ are unavailable in the two countries that produce most of the world's opium and heroin: Burma and Afghanistan.
We therefore are working through programs in major countries ­ Thailand, Laos, and Pakistan -- to combat the trade, and pursuing diplomatic and public channels to increase international awareness of the expanding heroin threat.
We also work closely with the United Nations Drug Control Program to address the threats from Burmese and Afghan heroin.
We will continue to support crop suppression programs in Laos, the third leading producer, Pakistan, and Thailand, where we have government cooperation.
In Pakistan, INL will build on its successful program, targeting cultivation and drug trafficking in the Khyber Agency of the Northwest Frontier Province.
Through training, institution building, and information sharing, we will continue to strengthen law enforcement efforts against the major organizations that target the U.S.
These programs have shown impressive results in Pakistan and Thailand but must be maintained to guard against FY 2000 Enacted 10,250 FY 2001 Estimate 10,700 FY2002 Request 11,700
recidivism until former poppy producing areas have firmly established alternative means of economic support.
The Laos program is still in its infancy but shows great promise.
Inter-regional Aviation Support ($ in thousands) Account INC National Interests: The INL aviation program continues to work aggressively toward the strategic goal of significantly reducing the amount of illegal drugs entering the United States by eradicating raw materials for drug production where they are cultivated.
Aerial eradication represents the most cost-effective method of illicit drug crop control, affording opportunities for large scale, fast moving campaigns.
In those countries that conduct manual rather than aerial eradication, aircraft are essential for transporting manual eradicators to otherwise inaccessible and/or unsecured drug growing areas.
Objectives 
INL's air program also provides crucial helicopter support to host country interdiction activities, ultimately reducing illegal drug entry into the United States.
Aviation reconnaissance resources are an essential element in locating, identifying and targeting drug activities, as well as verifying the results of operations.
Medium-lift airplanes facilitate the movement of personnel and equipment to remote, underdeveloped, inaccessible, or unsecured regions where both infrastructure and law enforcement presence are minimal.
The interregional aviation program is also furthering the operational goal of enhancing political determination to combat illegal drug production and trafficking by working hands-on with host government technical aviation personnel.
By instilling aviation technical and management skills and transferring technology, INL is building long-lasting institutions that have the personnel resources and the resolve to assume increased responsibility for counternarcotics air activities.
In FY 2002, the interregional aviation program will continue to place special emphasis on the expansion of successful eradication efforts in Putumayo in Colombia and other coca growing regions.
A high level of support will continue in Colombia in the areas of flight operations and instruction, maintenance quality control, and repair parts provision.
This will help to sustain a high aerial eradication sortie rate against illicit crops.
Simultaneously, we will conduct intensive training of police and military counternarcotics aviation elements to enable their assumption of increased responsibility for these areas.
We will also continue to provide support for helicopter operations in Peru and Bolivia.
Successful training and institution building will allow us to continue to reduce U.S. contractor presence at those locations.
The Office of Aviation will continue to pursue technological innovations to improve aircraft FY 2000 Actual 50,000 FY 2001 Estimate 50,000 FY 2002 Request 60,000
performance and explore new variations of aircraft to enhance eradication capabilities at a reasonable cost.
The inter-regional aviation program will continue its temporary deployments of aircraft and personnel on an as-needed basis elsewhere in the Andean region and Central America.
INL will exploit all opportunities for aerial eradication while maintaining aggressive interdiction activities.
Further emphasis will be placed on programs to upgrade spray aircraft capabilities.
Other Narcotic Programs ($ in thousands) Account INC National Interests: As a result of the June 1998 United Nations General Assembly Special Session, international organizations are becoming increasingly important to international drug control.
This meeting renewed the global commitment to combat illicit drugs and underscored the growing emphasis on such multilateral issues as chemical control, money laundering and maritime cooperation, and the elimination of illicit drug crops.
By supporting programs that promote the construction of effective counternarcotics institutions, we are also promoting democracy and the rule of law.
Within the U.S. Department of State, the Bureau of International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs has been charged with developing strategies and initiatives to achieve the international counternarcotics and criminal justice foreign policy national interest objectives.
INL maintains a cadre of program and technical experts to carry out its initiatives, both overseas and domestically.
This program category includes two discrete functional activities.
Regional Narcotics Training is designed to assist cooperating countries in creating effective national organizations for investigating drug trafficking and interdicting illegal narcotics.
Drug Awareness and Demand Reduction seeks to reduce the worldwide demand for illicit drugs by motivating foreign governments and institutions into giving increased attention to the negative effects of drug abuse upon society.
Both programs support the national interest of reducing the entry of drugs into the U.S. by providing technical expertise to foreign law enforcement, policy and demand reduction organizations.
It is important to note that additional law enforcement narcotics training and demand reduction programs are also funded from other parts of the INCLE and ACI budgets.
The Systems Support and Upgrades program continues to work aggressively toward the strategic goal of significantly reducing the amount of illegal drugs entering the U.S. by providing technical engineering support for aircraft configurations and upgrades, and training and sustainment for C-26 aircraft operations.
Both aerial eradication and aircraft denial programs are cost-effective methods of eradicating illicit drug crops and providing aerial platforms for surveillance and detection.
Objectives and Justification: International Organizations INL provides funds to international organizations such as the United Nations Drug Control Program (UNDCP), the OAS Inter-American Drug Abuse Control Commission FY 2000 Enacted 35,800 FY 2001 Estimate 37,500 FY2002 Request 49,000
(CICAD) and the Colombo Plan's Drug Advisory Program, and through them to smaller sub-regional programs or organizations.
Additionally, UN agencies, international financial institutions, and multilateral banks engaged in development programs in drug source countries have a role to play by factoring counternarcotics goals into their activities.
Key U.S. objectives for international organizations are: Maintain strategic leadership in focusing the international drug control effort and create a political atmosphere motivating other countries to view drug control as a major foreign policy concern and to strengthen domestic measures; Assist countries in developing the institutional infrastructure to reduce the production and trafficking of drugs by strengthening law enforcement agencies, modernizing judicial systems, and developing drug laws so that countries can investigate, prosecute, and punish major drug kingpins, and to reduce the demand for drugs; Use international organizations to plan and execute programs which expand multilateral cooperation, advance U.S. international drug control goals or take the place of U.S.-funded programs in countries where there is limited U.S. presence, or where multilateral organizations are more palatable to countries with sovereignty sensitivities; and Support efforts to make drug control an integral part of UN programs and ensure that a wide range of UN assistance furthers counternarcotics goals.
Continued USG assistance for UNDCP in FY 2002 is needed to pursue the global strategy to eliminate illicit opium and coca cultivation by 2008.
This aid is particularly important to allow UNDCP to assist countries to capitalize on the decline in opium production in Pakistan and Burma.
INL funds will be used to : support the global strategy to eliminate illicit cultivation; begin and sustain projects in the largest opium producing areas of South East Asia where the U.S. has limited access (e.g., Burma, China, Vietnam); support and leverage European support for programs in Southwest Asia where opium cultivation has been high, specifically in Afghanistan and Pakistan, including for an enhanced regional interdiction strategy; strengthen drug control institutions and regional cooperation in the NIS; coordinate and provide law enforcement training, judicial assistance, and demand reduction assistance to strengthen the counterdrug institutions in Russia and Africa; provide technical assistance to support the strengthening Western Hemisphere institutions involved in the investigation, prosecution, and confinement of major drug traffickers; continue legal advice into the drafting and implementation of legislation to implement the 1988 UN Convention; continue chemical control training; and continue a maritime cooperation training program.
Despite a broadening financial base, INL will continue to be CICAD's primary funding source in the years ahead.
The FY 2002 budget request will support the effective operation of the Multilateral Evaluation Mechanism (MEM) and enable CICAD to provide effective technical support and training that Member States will need to address
shortcomings identified in national or regional counternarcotics efforts.
Funding will encompass program activities that strengthen national drug commissions; enhance national performance and regional cooperation on control of drug smuggling, money laundering, chemical diversion, and arms trafficking; provide specialized law enforcement training, such as customs inspection and maritime interdiction; promote administration of justice reform; reduce or prevent drug abuse; develop or refine sub-regional models and curricula for drug awareness and crime prevention/anti-gang education (school- and community-based); promote best practices or establish regional standards for drug treatment; mobilize communities against drug abuse and trafficking; and promote sustainable alternative development in drug-producing regions.
It will also be used to reinforce practical, effective sub-regional cooperation, such as in Central America, the Andes, and the Caribbean, to address cross-border or spillover effects of the drug problem.
Regional Narcotics Training and Demand Reduction Regional Narcotics Training International counternarcotics training is managed and funded by the U.S. Department of State and carried out by the Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA), the U.S. Customs Service, and the U.S. Coast Guard.
Expansion of INL's narcotics training programs constitutes one of the surest means for implementing the current USG counternarcotics strategy for institution building and promotion of host nation selfsufficiency.
INL-funded training will continue to support the major U.S. and international strategies for combating narcotics trafficking worldwide.
Emphasis will be given to promoting training on a regional basis, and to contributing to the activities of international organizations, such as UNDCP and the OAS.
Through the meetings of major donors, the Dublin Group, UNDCP and other international fora, INL will coordinate with other providers of training, and urge them to shoulder greater responsibility in providing training that serves their particular strategic interests.
Programs dealing with financial crimes (e.g., methods for promoting asset seizure and combating money laundering) will continue to expand.
Drug Awareness and Demand Reduction Drug Awareness and Demand Reduction programs seek to reduce the worldwide demand for illicit drugs and minimize the flow of narcotics to the U.S. by stimulating foreign governments and institutions to increase attention to the effects of drug abuse on their societies, and to target trafficking groups responsible for these problems.
INL-funded training for FY 2002 will continue to strengthen host nation counternarcotics institutions so they can conduct more effective demand reduction and public awareness programs on their own.
The program will give particular attention to cocaine producing and transit countries in Latin America and address the heroin threat from Southeast Asia.
An expanded area of focus will be in countries of Eastern Europe and the former Soviet
Union.
These activities will be undertaken in collaboration with other donor countries and international organizations to reflect INL's emphasis on increased multilateral activities.
The training and technical assistance program in FY 2002 will be designed to prevent onset of use, to intervene at critical decision points in the lives of at-risk populations to prevent both initial use and further use, and to improve effective treatment programs for the addicted.
The program will expand its emphasis on the development of national, regional, and international coalitions of public/private sector organizations to strengthen international cooperation and actions against the drug trade.
Programs will continue to facilitate cross-cultural, comparative research to directly benefit foreign and U.S.-based demand reduction program.
New research in FY 2002 will evaluate juvenile correctional institutions and identify drug prevention best practices.
The Public Awareness Program will enhance the ability of host countries to build public support and strengthen the political will for implementing counternarcotics programs.
Training will focus on the development of national-level drug awareness campaigns that demonstrate connections between the drug trade and other concerns such as economic growth, democracy and the environment.
On the local level, training will focus on the establishment of effective drug awareness/education campaigns in schools and the community, including the use of media and advertising resources.
Technical assistance will focus on helping host governments conduct sustained drug awareness campaigns by developing linkages between the corporate sector and the mass media.
The Demand Reduction Program budget request will accommodate the increased need for training, enhance the development of international, regional and national counternarcotics partnerships, and facilitate cross-cultural, comparative research designed to improve U.S.-based services.
At the policy level, the program will focus assistance on building and strengthening national-level counternarcotics institutions with the capacity to develop comprehensive policies, programs, and strategies.
At the regional level, the program will enhance international coalitions of NGOs developed from FY 1996-2001, to mobilize international opinion against the drug trade, and to encourage governments to develop and implement strong counternarcotics policies and programs.
At the grassroots level, the program will continue to help establish and sustain strong community partnerships and coalitions of public and private sector programs for drug prevention, expand community mobilization efforts, and create or enhance effective community- and school-based prevention programs.
System Support and Upgrades The Systems Support and Upgrades program supports the following objectives: Provide program cost savings through standardization of services, support and upgrade aviation performance characteristics through economy of scale procurement ;
Provide standardization and sustainment support to those countries having received C-26 aircraft from the United States; and Provide flexibility for contracting cost fluctuations by maintaining a separate account for equipment upgrades and other contracting requirements.
The Systems Support and Upgrade Project has historically included C-26 support, an airborne surveillance initiative, refurbishment of OV-10 Broncos, and upgrade of UH-1H helicopters.
Through this funding, specialized systems that were previously not available were provided to meet counternarcotics mission requirements in support of surveillance, detection, eradication, interdiction and logistics.
This project also allowed INL to improve the performance characteristics of existing systems to better utilize their capability, extend their useful life, and increase the effectiveness of reconnaissance, eradication and interdiction efforts.
INL will support C-26 programs in Barbados, Trinidad and Tobago and with Colombia's National Police.
Program support will include training of sensor operators and pilots, contract logistical support, and spare parts and maintenance.
An appropriately tailored sparing protocol could save C-26 user nations as much as 50 percent of the cost of traditional spare parts packages.
INL has contracted for engineering and modification services to modify C-26 aircraft with a suite of surveillance sensors.
To ensure effective utilization of these powerful resources, funding will be provided for training personnel from host countries in data management and analysis and will strongly promote the development and implementation of information sharing protocols across host nation interagency and regional counternarcotics communities.
A "systems" approach to maritime- and land-based surveillance operations will emphasize the requirement for effective coordination between strategic and tactical airborne surveillance units as well as those directly involved in ground-based interdiction activities.
INL received 22 OV-10D aircraft previously used by DOD, which has increased capabilities for conducting massive coca and opium aerial eradication campaigns throughout Latin America.
The OV-10 refurbishment program will allow for major modification of these airframes to reduce weight and modernize electrical, avionics, cockpit configuration, and special mission equipment, to take full advantage of the aircraft's capability and extend its useful life.
INL also intends to conduct testing to determine the feasibility of using excess A-10 aircraft as the next generation spray platform.
Program Development 
management control seminars for overseas staff; developing training programs for new personnel; and coordinating policy and programs with other agencies and governments.
Program Development and Support (PD
Approximately 70 percent of the requested PD
Currently, these funds support 89 domestic direct-hire American staff.
Another 26 domestic positions are not funded from PD
The rest are involved in anticrime activities and are funded by the Department of State's Diplomatic and Consular Programs account.
Staff travel is also provided under PD
In addition, PD
Anti-Crime Programs ($ in thousands) Account INC National Interests: The international crime threat to U.S. interests is manifest across three broad, interrelated fronts: threats to Americans and their communities, threats to American businesses and financial institutions, and threats to global security and stability.
The impact of international crime is felt directly on the streets and in the communities of the United States: hundreds of thousands of individuals enter illegally each year, and there is wide-scale smuggling of drugs, firearms, stolen cars, child pornography, and other contraband across our borders.
Criminals seek to protect their anonymity and their wealth by laundering their profits through the vast, complex, and unevenly regulated international banking and financial systems.
We need to confront these activities and those who carry them out decisively with comprehensive, coordinated, and effective law enforcement, intelligence and diplomatic efforts that include forging crime control alliances with our international partners.
Objectives 
INL's international crime control programs have several elements.
Anticrime Programs The U.S. is making strides globally towards enhancing international cooperation in the fight against international organized crime.
In FY 2000, over 4,000 law enforcement officers worldwide received training under INL's Anticrime Training and Technical Assistance Program.
In addition to training, INL provides technical assistance, equipment and other assistance to countries to combat transnational crimes such as alien smuggling, trafficking in stolen vehicles, illegal trafficking in small arms and firearms, trafficking in persons, and money laundering and other financial crimes.
INL also has programs in anti-corruption, border controls, rule of law, critical infrastructure protection, and intellectual property rights.
INL will continue these training and technical assistance programs in FY 2002.
INL uses federal, state and local law enforcement agencies, the International Criminal Investigative Training Assistance Program (ICITAP), the Office of Overseas Prosecutorial Development and Training (OPDAT), and other organizations to provide law enforcement training programs and technical assistance to Russia and other countries in the NIS, Central and Eastern Europe, Latin America, Africa and Asia.
Multilateral organizations are another implementation mechanism, and INL provides contributions to several, including the UN Center for International Crime Prevention, the Financial Action Task Force, the Caribbean FY 2000 Actual 30,000 FY 2001 Estimate 45,000 FY 2002 Request 55,000
Financial Action Task Force, and the Group of States Against Corruption (GRECO), a group created under the auspices of the Council of Europe.
Civilian Police Contingent U.S. participation in CIVPOL requires a comprehensive program to recruit, screen, train, equip, pay and support U.S. police officers deployed overseas.
This program plans to provide the resources to develop a voluntary reserve of some 2,000 personnel who would remain in their regular jobs until called for duty.
After completing an initial training program, personnel would receive regular in-service training to maintain an appropriate level of readiness.
The names of trained individuals would be maintained in a central U.S. database to draw upon when the need arises for fast mobilization of trained law enforcement personnel.
Africa Regional Anticrime Program Most of the limited counternarcotics and anticrime funds spent to date in Africa have been focused on narcotics problems in Nigeria and South Africa.
African criminal groups that operate in these countries are now spreading throughout the region and increasing their geographic diversification.
Countries as disparate as Malawi, Ethiopia, and the Ivory Coast have become transit routes.
Nigerian and South African criminal organizations have matured and become transnational concerns that exploit whatever weakness they can find or, with their growing sums of money, create.
The law enforcement assault on these organizations must be region-wide and closely coordinated.
FY 2002 programs will continue to concentrate on Nigeria and southern Africa, but will also aid other governments and regional organizations.
Training will remain paramount in the Africa program.
Customs training, police science training, specialized training for counternarcotics units, demand reduction programs, technical assistance and public education campaigns will account for the majority of Africa regional funding.
Material assistance will continue through communications equipment, vehicles, computer databases and other equipment being provided to police organizations that work closely with U.S. law enforcement on transnational crime problems that affect the U.S. International Law Enforcement Academies (ILEAs) INL will continue to support the work of established ILEAs in Budapest and Bangkok.
The new facility for Gabarone should be completed during FY 2002, although some limited training will be provided in FY 2001.
The facility at Roswell, New Mexico should also be completely renovated by the end of FY 2002.
In addition, INL will, after surveying available locations, negotiate the establishment of a new ILEA in Latin America.
Other activities in FY 2002 will include developing and implementing initiatives targeted at the areas of growing international criminal activity which are not normally included in ILEA programs; and expanding the core curriculum and specialized training offered by the ILEAs to include hazardous waste dumping, smuggling proscribed hazardous materials, and trafficking in protected natural resources and endangered species.
Migrant Smuggling/Trafficking in Persons Over 700,000 people, mostly women and children, are trafficked every year around the world for sexual exploitation, sweatshop labor, domestic servitude, and other forms of forced labor, including into the United States.
Domestic violence comes in many different forms, whether as spousal, child or elder abuse, dowry deaths, or honor killings.
We have begun to see linkages between domestic violence and trafficking.
The United States has taken the lead internationally in giving violence against women and children a much higher foreign policy profile.
Congress recently authorized the State Department to establish the Office to Monitor and Combat Trafficking in Persons, which is expected to be located in INL.
In addition to providing support for programs in this area, the Office is taking the lead in drafting the annual report to Congress on countries' efforts to meet minimum standards as outlined in the Victims of Trafficking and Violence Prevention Act of 2000.
In response to the alien smuggling and trafficking in persons problems, INL created a Migrant Smuggling and Trafficking in Persons Coordination Center in FY 2001.
In FY 2002, INL will expand the capabilities of the Center by sponsoring regional alien smuggling conferences and providing funding to experts to conduct research in the field of alien smuggling.
International Narcotics Control and Law Enforcement ($ in thousands) FY 2000 Actual NARCOTICS PROGRAMS Country/Regional Programs Andean Counterdrug Initiative: /1 Colombia Total Interdiction Alternative Development/Institution Building Peru Total Interdiction Alternative Development/Institution Building Bolivia Total Interdiction Alternative Development/Institution Building Ecuador Total Interdiction Alternative Development/Institution Building Brazil Venezuela Panama Latin America Andean Regional Subtotal, Andean Counterdrug Initiative Other Western Hemisphere: Bahamas Guatemala Jamaica Mexico 8,000 5,000 4,200 4,987 7,000 1,174,816 2,000 1,200 1,000 154,400 20,000 15,000 10,000 11,000 731,000 101,000 21,200 13,200 17,000 2,200 2,200 47,000 39,000 19,000 25,000 158,000 57,000 27,000 52,000 35,000 79,000 101,000 54,000 208,000 80,000 55,000 48,000 21,000 146,500 156,000 77,000 FY 2001 Estimate FY 2002 Request
894,429 686,429
48,000 48,000
399,000 252,500
1,000 3,000 800 4,071
1,200 3,000 1,200 10,000
1,200 4,000 1,550 12,000
Latin America Regional Subtotal, Western Hemisphere Asia/Middle East Regional East Asia and the Pacific: Laos Thailand
7,806 16,677 4,798 7,000 4,000 3,000
7,957 23,357 3,328 7,200 4,200 3,000
12,500 31,250 7,050 8,200 4,200 4,000
International Narcotics Control and Law Enforcement ($ in thousands) FY 2000 Actual South Asia: Counterthreat in Southwest Asia Pakistan 3,250 Interregional Aviation Support Subtotal, Narcotics Country Programs Other Narcotics Programs International Organizations Regional Narcotics Training 
18,222 9,553 2,225 30,000 1,322,341 1,159 1,323,500
10,265 10,000 7,500 12,300 4,935 45,000 324,285 715 325,000
15,330 10,000 7,500 14,500 7,670 55,000 948,000 948,000
/1 - Andean Counterdrug Initiative begins in FY 2002.
FY 2000 levels include $1,018 million in emergency supplemental funding for Plan Colombia.
Migration and Refugee Assistance 
FY 2000 Enacted 622,625 12,452 635,077
FY 2001 Estimate* 698,460 14,967 713,427
FY 2002 Request 715,000 15,000 730,000
In FY 2000, $166.6 million was carried forward from the FY 1999 Emergency Supplemental Appropriations Act ( P.L. 106-31), associated with the Kosovo crisis.
/b Of the $622.6 million appropriated in FY 2000, $21 million was not made available until September 30, 2000.
This $21 million is included in the FY 2000 column of the chart above.
National Interests: Humanitarian Response is a national interest as well as a strategic goal in the United States International Affairs Strategic Plan (IASP).
Among the Department's principal funding components for achieving several elements of this goal are the Migration and Refugee Assistance (MRA) appropriation, together with the U.S. Emergency Refugee and Migration Assistance (ERMA) Fund for unexpected, urgent refugee and migration needs.
Either directly or through contributions to international organizations such as the UN High Commissioner for Refugees (UNHCR), the International Organization for Migration (IOM), the UN Relief and Works Agency for Palestine Refugees in the Near East (UNRWA), and the International Committee of the Red Cross (ICRC), these funds support programs for the protection of refugees and conflict victims, the provision of basic needs to sustain their life and health, and the resolution of refugee problems through voluntary repatriation, local integration, or permanent resettlement in a third country, including the United States.
These funds also support efforts to manage international migration flows humanely and effectively.
The total FY 2002 request of $730,000,000 for refugee and migration assistance funding consists of $715,000,000 for the MRA appropriation, and $15,000,000 for the ERMA Fund.
Programs funded by these appropriations also contribute to foreign policy goals pertaining to national security, including preventing and solving crises, promoting cooperation, and international peacekeeping (when done in the context of humanitarian emergencies), as well as to goals contained under global issues, including the protection of health and the environment.
For FY 2002, the following areas have been identified as specific goals for MRA funding: Assistance, Protection, and Durable Solutions ­ Maintain viable and efficient international humanitarian response mechanisms at internationally accepted standards, promote equal access to effective protection and first asylum to refugees
and conflict victims, and support voluntary repatriation of refugees, providing a catalyst for their sustainable reintegration in the country of origin.
International Migration ­ Support efforts to manage international migration flows humanely and effectively.
Resettlement ­ Provide resettlement opportunities to refugees and encourage other countries to do so.
Objectives and Justification: The MRA appropriation supports programs that uphold the humanitarian principles the United States shares with others in the international community by providing assistance to victims of persecution and civil strife.
Either directly through nongovernmental organizations or through contributions to international organizations such as UNHCR, IOM, UNRWA, and the ICRC, these funds support programs for the protection of refugees and conflict victims, the provision of basic needs to sustain life and health, and the resolution of refugee problems through voluntary repatriation, local integration, or permanent resettlement in a third country (including the United States).
As well as efforts to manage international migration flows humanely and effectively.
The MRA is an annual appropriation used to fund: 1) overseas assistance activities, which support the first two goals outlined above; 2) the admission of refugees to the United States, supporting the resettlement goal; 3) a grant to support the resettlement of humanitarian migrants in Israel, supporting the international migration goal; and 4) the majority of administrative expenses of the Bureau of Population, Refugees, and Migration (PRM).
The ERMA Fund is a no-year appropriation, drawn upon by the President to "meet unexpected urgent refugee and migration needs" when it is determined to be "important to the national interest" to do so.
Overseas Assistance: This request will support the continuing assistance requirements for populations of concern, and will focus on the following priorities: Assuring that basic international life-sustaining standards of care and protection are provided across geographic regions, particularly in Africa, and especially focusing on health; Working with other governments, international organizations, and NGOs to enhance international protection for vulnerable groups and address the physical security of refugees, conflict victims, and humanitarian workers; Supporting voluntary repatriation solutions that ensure safety and dignity and provide support to communities of return; and Expanding the Department's consultation and coordination with other donors and the international organizations to ensure that the collective international effort meets critical humanitarian needs.
Refugee Admissions: This request will support a level of admissions similar to that in FY 2000 and FY 2001.
The President, following the annual consultation process with
Congress later in FY 2001, will determine the final number of refugee admissions and the regional allocations.
Refugee admissions are supported through PRM funding of: private U.S. voluntary agencies that conduct refugee processing and cultural orientation overseas, as well as provide initial reception and placement services in the United States, and the International Organization for Migration (IOM), which provides transportation, processing, medical screening services, and cultural orientation for refugees coming to the United States.
Refugees to Israel: This request will provide a grant to the United Israel Appeal in support of humanitarian migrants in Israel from the former Soviet Union and other countries of distress.
Administrative Expenses: This request finances the administrative expenses of a staff of 112 permanent positions in the Bureau of Population, Refugees, and Migration.
Costs related to a staff of five permanent positions dedicated to international population activities are included in the Department of State's Diplomatic and Consular Programs (D
The D
Migration and Refugee Assistance Overseas Assistance ($ in thousands) Account MRA FY 2000 Enacted 455,925 FY 2001 Estimate 514,270 FY 2002 Request 509,000
The FY 2002 request for Overseas Assistance is $509 million, a decrease of almost $5.3 million from the FY 2001 estimate.
This primarily reflects a downsizing of MRA funding for the Balkans as the refugee situation there continues to improve.
Support for Africa, on the other hand, will increase by $6.6 million.
This increase will support new initiatives to address refugee health problems.
The primary purposes of overseas assistance funding are to meet international protection and short-term, life-sustaining needs of refugees and conflict victims, and to support durable solutions, notably voluntary repatriation.
Many nations hosting large groups of refugees and victims of conflict are among the world's least developed.
The refugees' presence often strains limited resources and may result in serious problems that affect U.S. foreign policy interests.
A continuing element of the assistance effort will be support for lasting solutions to refugee problems.
The FY 2002 request will be used to respond to programs as they evolve from care and maintenance in first asylum countries to self-sufficiency or repatriation.
Funds may also be used to assist in the initial reintegration of refugees who have repatriated.
U.S. support for repatriations will be provided from MRA funds to the extent possible, once basic care and maintenance requirements for existing refugee populations have been met.
Over the past two years, the United States has worked to bring the level of services provided to refugees overseas up to basic acceptable international standards of care.
The FY 2002 request will support new health initiatives in Africa and South Asia that will seek a more targeted approach to address increasing refugee health problems by focusing on specific interventions in areas such as HIV-AIDS and malaria.
U.S. international migration policy aims to promote sound migration management, which balances governmental respect for the human rights of migrants with governmental responsibility to maintain the security of its territory.
MRA funds will support activities to promote international understanding of migration with a special emphasis on protection for those in need of it.
U.S. refugee policy is based on the premise that the care of refugees and other conflict victims, and the pursuit of permanent solutions for refugee crises, are shared international responsibilities.
Accordingly, most overseas assistance funds will be contributed to programs administered by international organizations.
Although the United States is just one of many donors, in most cases the U.S. Government is the largest individual donor.
The primary recipients of U.S. contributions are listed below and their major activities are discussed in the regional presentations that follow.
U.S. support may be provided to other organizations as required to meet specific program needs and objectives.
In general, funds for overseas assistance will be used to respond to the 2002 calendar year budget appeals issued by international organizations.
The Office of the United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees (UNHCR) has a worldwide mandate to assist host governments to protect and care for refugees as well as to promote lasting solutions to refugee situations.
Active promotion of voluntary repatriation where conditions in the country of origin are suitable is also key to both finding refugee solutions and maintaining the willingness of governments to offer first asylum.
In 2002, it is anticipated that UNHCR will continue its progress in orienting protection and assistance activities toward refugee women and children, who comprise about 80 percent of most refugee populations.
The International Committee of the Red Cross (ICRC) is an independent, internationally funded, humanitarian institution mandated under the terms of the Geneva Conventions.
The United States is party to the Geneva Conventions, under which ICRC is called upon to provide assistance and protection to prisoners of war and political detainees, assist and protect civilian victims of armed conflict, provide needed medical assistance to conflict victims, trace missing persons and separated family members, and disseminate information on the principles of humanitarian law.
The United Nations Relief and Works Agency for Palestine Refugees in the Near East (UNRWA) has a continuing mandate from the United Nations to provide educational, medical, relief, and social assistance to the approximately 3.7 million registered Palestinian refugees located in Jordan, Syria, Lebanon, Gaza, and the West Bank.
The International Organization for Migration (IOM) works with governments, other international organizations, and voluntary agencies to provide for the orderly migration of persons in need of international migration services.
IOM provides operational services for humanitarian migration and technical assistance to governments and others interested in the development of migration policy, legislation, and administration.
The World Food Program (WFP) is the principal vehicle for multilateral food aid within the UN system.
WFP distributes commodities supplied by donor countries for protracted refugee and displaced person projects, and emergency food assistance, as well as development operations.
MRA funds will be contributed to WFP toward the cash expenses of refugee feeding programs undertaken in cooperation with UNHCR.
The U.S. Government provides food commodities to WFP under other appropriations.
The Department intends to use the funds requested for FY 2002 to respond to the calendar year 2002 requirements of the organizations listed above.
As assistance needs
change, some organizations may find it necessary to issue new or increased appeals funds during the course of the year.
Therefore, this request may be used during the quarter of the fiscal year to respond to urgent appeals that may be issued late in the calendar year.
Programs of non-governmental organizations may commence at any in the fiscal year, with funding provided for a twelve-month period.
for first 2001 point
The Department may reallocate funds between regions or organizations within the overseas assistance request level of $509,000,000 in response to changing requirements.
MRA PROGRAM SUMMARY (dollars in thousands)
FY 2000 Actual Overseas Assistance Africa /a East Asia /c Europe /a,c Near East/North Africa South Asia /a,c Western Hemisphere Multiregional Activities Migration /b
FY 2001 Estimate $ 514,270 180,900 26,600 100,853 99,147 34,800 13,626 58,344
FY 2002 Request $ 509,000 187,500 17,000 79,000 102,500 35,500 14,500 56,000 17,000
Increase or Decrease (-) $ (5,270) 6,600 (9,600) (21,853) 3,353 700 874 (2,344) 17,000 20,146 132 1,532 16,540
/c
$ 455,925 154,847 15,485 57,692 108,250 29,879 16,486 73,286
Refugee Admissions Refugees to Israel
/a,c
92,900 60,000 /a
109,854 59,868 14,468 $698,460
130,000 60,000 16,000 $715,000
Administrative Expenses Appropriation Total a/ /a,c
13,800 $622,625
In FY 2000, $166.6 million was carried forward from the FY 1999 Emergency Supplemental Appropriations Act (P.L. 106-31), associated with the Kosovo crisis, and obligated as follows: $380,000 for Administrative Expenses, $23.3 million for Admissions, $22.3 million for Overseas Assistance in Africa, $117 million for Overseas Assistance in Europe, and $3.4 million for Overseas Assistance in South Asia.
This carryforward amount is not included in the chart above . b / In FY 2000 and FY 2001, funds for Migration activities were included within the individual Overseas Assistance regions.
In FY 2002 they will be separated out into a new Overseas Assistance category.
c / Of the $622.6 million appropriated in FY 2000, $21.0 million was not made available until September 30, 2000.
These funds have been allotted in FY 2001 as follows: $1 million for Overseas Assistance in East Asia, $3.6 million for Overseas Assistance in Europe, $250,000 for Overseas Assistance in South Asia, $1.5 million for Multiregional Activities, and $14.7 million for Refugee Admissions.
This $21 million is included in the FY 2000 column of the chart above.
Assistance Programs in Africa Program Summary ($ in thousands) Account FY 2000 Enacted FY 2001 Estimate* MRA 154,847 180,900 * Does not include funds for Migration activities.
FY 2002 Request 187,500
The Administration requests $187,500,000 to respond with appropriate U.S. contributions to the basic needs of refugees and conflict victims in sub-Saharan Africa.
Some 3.5 million of the world's refugees are spread across the African continent.
Some voluntary repatriations took place in 2000 to Liberia, Rwanda, Sierra Leone, Somalia, Kenya, and Eritrea.
However, more refugees were generated in 2000 than returned as fighting erupted between Eritrea and Ethiopia and internal conflict intensified in Angola, the Democratic Republic of Congo, Sudan, Sierra Leone and Burundi.
In late 2000, some 500,000 Sierra Leonean and Liberian refugees in Guinea and their Guinean host communities were victimized by rebel attacks, forcing many to flee northward in Guinea or to return to Sierra Leone.
At the beginning of 2001, efforts were underway to relocate refugees to safer camps in Guinea.
The possibility of peace in the Congo has raised hopes for increased humanitarian assistance to refugees and internally displaced.
Despite cross border attacks, concerns about the neutrality and security of refugee camps, and problems of humanitarian access, most African countries continue to be generous refugee hosts.
United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees The U.S. contributions to UNHCR programs in Africa continue to fund protection and the most basic material assistance to save and maintain the lives of refugees and other conflict victims of concern to UNHCR.
Protection, both legal and physical, including protection of women and children from sexual violence and protection from recruitment into armed conflicts, has become more challenging.
Since humanitarian assistance has not always been up to basic international standards in such life-sustaining sectors as nutrition and water/sanitation, contributions to UNHCR and other implementing partners will continue to seek to address these gaps.
UNHCR will also pursue opportunities for permanent solutions for some refugee populations.
In 2002, UNHCR is expected to be implementing repatriation and reintegration programs in Eritrea, Ethiopia, and Somalia.
Repatriation assistance for returning refugees includes transportation home, a small package of household and agricultural items to facilitate the returnees' re-establishment, and limited rehabilitation of social infrastructure, such as clinics and water projects.
There will continue to be a focus on achieving a smooth hand-off to development agencies that can most effectively deal with post-conflict situations.
International Committee of the Red Cross
ICRC, often in partnership with other elements of the international Red Cross movement, is called upon to provide relief and medical assistance in the most difficult and dangerous areas of countries caught up in armed conflict where success depends largely on the cooperation of the warring parties.
This task has become even more difficult in recent times as the principle of neutral humanitarian assistance has been increasingly rejected by parties to conflict.
Angola, Burundi, Congo, Ethiopia, Eritrea, Sudan, and Sierra Leone are examples of such ICRC action.
The ICRC program in Africa provides relief and medical assistance to conflict victims and displaced persons, and assistance to political prisoners and prisoners of war.
ICRC also undertakes tracing services (for detainees as well as family members separated by conflict.)
World Food Program In recent years, contributions to WFP have supported feeding programs for Sierra Leonean and Liberian refugees in Guinea; for Ethiopian and Eritrean refugees in Sudan; for Somali refugees in Ethiopia, Djibouti, and Kenya; for Sudanese refugees in Uganda, Ethiopia, and Kenya; for Angolan refugees in Zambia and Namibia; and for Congolese and Burundi refugees in Tanzania.
In FY 2002, funds may be contributed to WFP for expenses of such programs undertaken in conjunction with UNHCR, including local/regional purchase of food to fill nutritional gaps.
Other International Organizations/Non-Governmental Organizations Non-governmental organizations are key partners with the international organizations in Africa, often in specialized areas such as health care, food distribution, education, and other assistance for children.
Funds will be provided directly to non-governmental organizations to complement the programs of UNHCR and to address the need to bring basic assistance up to international life-sustaining standards of care.
The United Nations Children's Fund (UNICEF), the International Organization for Migration (IOM), the International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies (IFRC), and other international organizations or nongovernmental organizations may also receive funding for complementary assistance.
Assistance Programs in East Asia Program Summary ($ in thousands)
Account FY 2000 Enacted FY 2001 Estimate* MRA 15,485 26,600 * Does not include funds for Migration activities.
FY 2002 Request 17,000
The Administration requests $17,000,000 in FY 2002 for assistance programs in East Asia.
Burmese continue to be the largest group of refugees in the region.
Of the Rohingya refugees who fled to Bangladesh from late 1991 to mid-1992, over 230,000 had voluntarily repatriated to Burma and small-scale repatriation was continuing at the beginning of 2001.
Those remaining in Bangladesh at the end of the organized repatriation (estimated 15,000) will need a durable solution.
UNHCR is negotiating with the government about this.
At the beginning of 2001, some 127,000 refugees from a variety of ethnic groups in Burma still resided in camps in Thailand to which they had fled to escape attacks by the Burmese army and its allies as well as from general persecution, such as forced labor.
The Thai Government continues to cooperate with the UNHCR on the registration and protection of refugee camp populations.
United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees By the beginning of 2001, Burmese and residual Timorese refugees were the largest caseloads of concern to UNHCR.
U.S. contributions to UNHCR will include funds for protection of Burmese refugees in Thailand, while assistance to those refugees is provided through NGOs.
U.S. contributions will also cover reintegration and recovery needs in East Timor as well as Burmese refugees who returned from Bangladesh.
International Committee of the Red Cross U.S. contributions to ICRC support ongoing programs such as visits to detainees and emergency relief and medical care for conflict victims.
Armed conflict in Southeast Asia tends to be localized, e.g., Aceh and Irian Jaya in Indonesia.
Regional delegations throughout East Asia, therefore, largely concentrate on ICRC's core activities of protection, tracing, dissemination, and medical assistance (such as prosthetics).
World Food Program Funds may be contributed to WFP toward expenses of programs undertaken in cooperation with UNHCR, for example, the feeding programs for Rohingya refugees in Bangladesh and assistance to returned Timorese.
Other International Organizations/Non-Governmental Organizations Burmese refugees in Thailand are assisted by NGOs that implement public health programs, including water and sanitation and skills training, and provide food aid as well as some basic household assistance such as blankets and mosquito nets.
The FY 2002 request will continue funding NGOs working in Thailand along the Burmese border, as well as international and non-governmental organization programs that deliver services to refugees, asylum seekers, and repatriates to address needs not covered by the programs of international organizations outlined above.
Assistance Programs in Europe Program Summary ($ in thousands) Account FY 2000 Enacted FY 2001 Estimate* MRA 57,692 100,853 * Does not include funds for Migration activities.
FY 2002 Request 79,000
The Administration requests $79,000,000 to respond to assistance needs in Europe, including the New Independent States (NIS) of the former Soviet Union.
This is a decrease of $21,853,000 from the FY 2001 estimate, reflecting primarily a downsizing of MRA funding for the Balkans as the refugee situation continues to improve.
This also reflects the transfer of Migration funds from this regional line to a new Migration line.
In Kosovo, the international community will continue to support efforts to stabilize and protect ethnic minority communities.
Approximately 220,000 ethnic minorities remain displaced from Kosovo and continuing conflict on the Kosovo/Macedonia border and Kosovo/Serbia boundary threatens to displace others.
There remain over one million Bosnian and Croatian refugees and internally displaced persons.
Five years after the Dayton Accords were signed, a promising surge in the return of ethnic minority refugees/IDPs occurred in the latter half of 1999 and during 2000.
This welcome trend is expected to continue in 2001 and 2002.
Continued funding is therefore required through FY 2002 to support UNHCR-led relief and repatriation efforts in the Balkans.
MRA funding is also needed to support humanitarian efforts for the refugees and displaced persons from the Caucasus.
To respond to the Kosovo crisis in 1999, support requirements were funded from supplemental appropriations.
The request for FY 2002 funding in Europe represents a continuing decline in funding, since immediate needs stemming from the Kosovo crisis have been met and protection, the primary focus of UNHCR and ICRC, and humanitarian needs in Bosnia continue to decline as persons return home and rebuild their lives.
Opportunities for solutions in the Balkans increased with political changes in Yugoslavia in October 2000 and increased returns to Bosnia-Herzegovina and Croatia.
International community efforts to promote returns and other solutions in the region intensified in FY 2001 and will continue in FY 2002.
Continued funding is required through FY 2002 to support these critical efforts.
The U.S. Government plays a catalytic role in the international community to promote returns in the Balkans.
In the former Soviet Union, the transformation from Soviet rule to independent states continues to be a volatile process.
Some nine million persons in the NIS are refugees, displaced persons, repatriates, or other migrants.
Fighting in Chechnya which started in 1999 displaced persons as many as 330,000 people who need care and maintenance now, and eventually, reintegration assistance.
The North Caucasus region of the Russian Federation, which had tens of thousands of Internally Displaced Persons (IDPs) and refugees from several conflicts even before the latest fighting, will continue to be an
unstable region prone to outbreaks of violence.
Despite the peace accord signed in Tajikistan in 1997, poverty and insecurity wrack this nation and hamper efforts to reintegrate some 80,000 returned refugees.
Despite ongoing talks, there has been little progress in resolving the conflict over Abkhazia, which affects some 270,000 internally displaced persons.
Recent peace talks on Nagorno-Karabakh are more promising, and could help resolve the fate of some of the one million internally displaced and refugees this year.
The Administration is committed to supporting continued attention to the issues outlined in the Program of Action (POA) of the 1996 Regional Conference on Refugees and Migration in the Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS Conference).
Although the POA expired in 2000, the countries of the NIS and the international community have committed themselves to activities that will ensure that these issues continue to be addressed.
IOM, the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe (OSCE), and UNHCR will continue to implement related programs throughout the NIS and will require funding in FY 2002.
United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees In FY 2002, UNHCR's efforts in Bosnia and Croatia will include sharply reduced levels of protection, legal aid and basic humanitarian assistance for the return of refugees and internally displaced persons (IDPs) affected by the 1991-95 wars.
Given new opportunities to promote durable solutions in the FRY, UNHCR will focus on protection, legal assistance, information, and reintegration assistance to refugees and IDPs there as well as continue to provide more limited humanitarian assistance to those unable to return in 2001 and 2002.
UNHCR programs seek to stabilize ethnic minority communities.
International Committee of the Red Cross In the former Yugoslavia, ICRC plays a unique role among international agencies by facilitating exchange of information on missing persons, conducting prison visits, and building the capacity of local Red Cross societies.
ICRC will also continue limited relief activities to the most vulnerable in FY 2002.
ICRC continues to play a lead role in conflict situations on the Kosovo/Macedonia border and Kosovo/Serbia boundary.
In FY 2002 funds will continue to support ICRC's programs in the NIS to provide emergency assistance, to further develop ICRC's innovative tolerance education programs based on international humanitarian law, and to promote the basic principles of international humanitarian law and the law of war.
U.S. support for ICRC enabled it to respond immediately to the humanitarian needs of displaced persons that fled fighting in Chechnya starting in 1999 and to maintain important activities in Chechnya, despite the difficult security situation there.
World Food Program Funds will be contributed to WFP for programs undertaken in cooperation with UNHCR.
WFP will continue to provide food and coordinate food supplies for the most vulnerable persons of concern in FY 2002.
In past years, contributions have been made
for WFP programs in the Balkans and toward WFP components of consolidated appeals for Tajikistan, the South Caucasus, and the North Caucasus.
Other International Organizations/Non-Governmental Organizations Our partnership with other international and non-governmental organizations in the former Yugoslavia is unprecedented.
Continued funding will be required to support these organizations as they facilitate return and provide assistance to refugees and IDPs in the Balkans.
Non-governmental organizations serve as implementing partners for UNHCR assistance and repatriation efforts.
In addition, NGOs work in cooperation with other donors/partners to target specific populations.
For example, the U.S. Department of State has funded NGOs to implement programs facilitating the return of displaced persons to areas where their ethnic group is in the minority and programs to stabilize ethnic minority communities.
In the NIS, funding to NGOs is primarily used to support emergency needs of refugees and internally displaced persons not provided by UNHCR and ICRC.
NGO programs focus on building the capacity of their indigenous NGO partners and encouraging self-sufficiency for refugee and IDP communities.
In FY 2001, we will partner with non-governmental organizations in Chechnya and Ingushetiya to enhance assistance to IDPs in programs coordinated with UNHCR and the rest of the international community.
Assistance Programs in the Near East and North Africa Program Summary ($ in thousands)
Account FY 2000 Enacted FY 2001 Estimate* MRA 108,250 99,147 *Does not include funds for Migration activities.
FY 2002 Request 102,500
The Administration requests $102,500,000 for the Near East and North Africa assistance programs.
The major focus in the region continues to be on the long-standing Palestinian refugee population, which UNRWA is mandated to assist.
United Nations Relief and Works Agency for Palestine Refugees in the Near East UNRWA is mandated by the United Nations to assist Palestinian refugees in Jordan, Syria, Lebanon, Gaza, and the West Bank.
Over 3.7 million refugees are registered with UNRWA, which provides education, vocational training, relief and social services, medical assistance, and small-scale income-generation projects.
UNRWA schools and training centers are leading factors in helping Palestinian refugees become economically self-reliant.
Since UNRWA began operations in 1950, the United States has been a major contributor toward its programs.
U.S. Government funding helps to provide some stability in the lives of the Palestinian refugee population in the region and contributes to a climate conducive to a peaceful resolution of regional problems.
United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees These funds will support UNHCR operations throughout the Near East and North Africa, including large programs in Egypt, Iran, and Iraq.
Refugees in Lebanon, Saudi Arabia, Syria, and other countries continue to require protection and monitoring.
Somali refugees in Yemen continue to receive UNHCR support, as do the Western Saharan refugees in Algeria who are awaiting a political settlement before returning to the Western Sahara.
International Committee of the Red Cross Throughout the Near East, ICRC is often the only international humanitarian organization that is able to access areas of civil strife to provide needed medical and other assistance to conflict victims and displaced persons.
ICRC assists conflict victims in the region, with particular emphasis on tracing and protection of detainees.
It also addresses unresolved humanitarian problems (particularly prisoners of war and those missing in action) related to conflicts where hostilities have ceased.
ICRC's emergency programs will continue to provide emergency shelter, food and water, medical care, and protection to civilians displaced by conflict in the region.
Other International Organizations/Non-Governmental Organizations Funds may be contributed for special projects of international organizations or nongovernmental organizations designed to complement the assistance efforts of international organizations or to meet special needs of refugees and migrants in the region.
Assistance Programs in South Asia Program Summary ($ in thousands)
Account FY 2000 Enacted MRA 29,879 * Does not include funds for migration.
FY 2001 Estimate* 34,800
FY 2002 Request 35,500
The Administration requests $35,500,000 in FY 2002 for assistance programs in South Asia.
The preponderant refugee group in the region continues to be the approximately 2.5 million Afghan refugees in Pakistan and Iran.
Voluntary repatriation from Iran accelerated in 2000, but the 183,000 returnees were only a fraction of the estimated 1.4 million Afghan refugees living in Iran.
The war in Afghanistan continued with the annual offensives displacing tens of thousands and leaving their home areas devastated.
A severe drought affected large sections of the country in 2000, damaging crops, killing livestock and decreasing the ability of the people to survive without assistance.
Most international assistance programs resumed in Afghanistan in 2000 despite concerns over security, Taliban restrictions on relief agencies, and the Taliban's treatment of women and minorities.
The government in Pakistan was slow to allow UNHCR to register new arrivals as refugees in 2000, and at times closed the border to prevent large inflows of Afghans, maintaining that they were fleeing poverty and the drought rather than persecution.
As 2001 began, this standoff resulted in a situation wherein 70,000 to 80,000 Afghans were camped out in a makeshift site with no UNHCR assistance allowed.
The Department has given, and will continue to give, special attention to the needs of women in the programs of international organizations and NGOs.
There were still over 92,000 registered Bhutanese refugees in six camps in eastern Nepal at the beginning of 2001, out of some 110,000 Bhutanese refugees in Nepal.
Talks in 2000 between the two governments aimed at finding a resolution to the citizenship issues surrounding these refugees finally bore fruit in the fall.
Joint BhutanNepal verification of the refugees' identity and citizenship began in early 2001.
Of the original 120,000 Tamil refugees who fled to India from Sri Lanka in June 1990 as a result of ethnic violence, approximately 65,000 refugees remain, living in camps in India's southern Tamil Nadu State.
Voluntary repatriation remained stalled as the ongoing conflict in Sri Lanka continued in 2000.
India is also host to over 130,000 Tibetan refugees.
Approximately 2,500 new Tibetan refugees arrive in India each year.
United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees The primary focus of the U.S. with regard to UNHCR programs in South Asia will be the continued protection as well as care for the most vulnerable refugee groups remaining in Pakistan and Iran, with special attention to the needs of refugee women and girls, especially in health and education.
At the same time, to the extent possible, our contributions to UNHCR will support repatriation and reintegration inside Afghanistan
aimed at establishing stability and a return to normal conditions of life for refugee groups that decide to return.
UNHCR is also concerned with the internally displaced in Sri Lanka.
In Nepal, UNHCR's presence supports Tibetan refugees in transit to India as well as the Bhutanese refugee population.
International Committee of the Red Cross ICRC is exp ected to maintain programs for victims of the Afghan conflict with a focus on emergency medical assistance and visits to detainees.
ICRC runs a number of surgical and field hospitals for war-wounded Afghans, and operates orthopedic centers that provide complete rehabilitative services to the disabled.
ICRC also provides emergency non-food assistance to the internally displaced and vulnerable, as well as water and sanitation projects in urban areas.
Protection and tracing activities are important aspects of ICRC's Afghan Conflict Victims program.
ICRC is also involved in training in Sri Lanka as well Kashmir.
With no resolution humanitarian efforts through World Food Program In recent years, U.S. contributions to WFP have supported feeding programs for Afghan refugees and repatriates and Bhutanese refugees.
In FY 2002, funds may be contributed to WFP for expenses of such programs undertaken in cooperation with UNHCR.
Other International Organizations/Non-Governmental Organizations The Department will continue to give special attention to the needs of Afghan women and girls, particularly through health and education projects implemented by nongovernmental organizations.
To the extent possible, consideration will be given to supporting projects that assist the reintegration of returnees or the repatriation of refugees to Afghanistan.
The Department will continue to support NGO programs that assist Tibetan refugees.
Funds may also be contributed for projects of international or non-governmental organizations designed to complement the assistance efforts of UNHCR and ICRC to meet special needs of refugees and migrants in the region.
protection, tracing, medical assistance, and human rights as with protection of detainees and conflict victims in to those conflicts in sight, support for ICRC's critical U.S. contributions to its regional appeal will continue.
Assistance Programs in the Western Hemisphere Program Summary ($ in thousands)
Account FY 2000 Enacted FY 2001 Estimate* MRA 16,486 13,626 * Does not include funds for Migration activities.
FY 2002 Request 14,500
The Administration requests $14,500,000 for the Western Hemisphere assistance program.
While the lessening of civil and political strife in some parts of the region has dramatically reduced the number of refugees, armed conflict in Colombia continues to displace civilians in need of humanitarian assistance and protection from ICRC and UNHCR.
Other IOs are also active in providing assistance to IDPs including WFP, the United Nations Children's Fund (UNICEF), and the Pan American Health Organization (PAHO).
Additionally, several American NGOs are partnering with Colombian NGOs to provide aid.
While Colombia represents the most significant humanitarian assistance requirement in this region, ongoing UNHCR and ICRC programs of protection and humanitarian law dissemination throughout the hemisphere are needed to maintain a capacity for dealing with refugee and asylum needs now and potentially in the future.
UNHCR training workshops in the Caribbean are particularly important, as they have no permanent staff in the region, operating through a system of "honorary liaisons".
United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees U.S. contributions will help support UNHCR programs that directly assist the sma ll numbers of refugees throughout the hemisphere and work with states to put in place effective regimes for providing legal protection to refugees and preventing their forcible return to a country where they might face torture or persecution.
UNHCR will also carry out a modest program in Colombia to assist the government in responding to the assistance and protection needs of internally displaced persons.
International Committee of the Red Cross Funds will be contributed to ICRC assistance programs in Ce ntral and South America, primarily for Colombia, Mexico, and Peru, and for its network of four regional offices and delegations.
With fewer active conflicts in the region, ICRC's emergency relief to conflict victims, aid to prisoners of war, and tracing activities have decreased somewhat (with the notable exception of Colombia), enabling ICRC to focus on prison visits and promotion of international humanitarian law.
Other International Organizations/Non-Governmental Organizations The Department may consider funding other relevant international organizations, and NGOs as required to meet special requirements for assistance to refugees, internally displaced, and migrants in the region and/or complement the assistance efforts of the international organizations outlined above.
Multiregional Activities Program Summary ($ in thousands) Account FY 2000 Enacted FY 2001 Estimate* MRA 73,286 58,344 * Does not include funds for Migration activities.
FY 2002 Request 56,000
For FY 2002, the Administration requests $56,000,000 for Multiregional Activities.
These funds support the U.S. contribution to the headquarters budget of the ICRC, the headquarters and global program costs of UNHCR, the multiregional refugee activities of international or non-governmental organizations, and international migration activities.
(The ICRC contribution is paid in Swiss francs, and the dollar amount will vary according to the exchange rate at the time of payment.)
These funds will support multiregional refugee activities of international and non-governmental organizations, particularly UNHCR, including special programs for refugee women and children.
International Committee of the Red Cross The funding request for the ICRC headquarters budget covers the permanent activities carried out by ICRC staff at the Geneva headquarters only; field-related costs are normally attributed to the regional appeals.
The contribution will be calculated at not less than 10 percent of the 2002 ICRC headquarters budget in accordance with the Foreign Relations Authorization Act, 1988 and 1989.
The ICRC headquarters budget is funded through voluntary contributions by governments and national societies of the Red Cross; the Swiss Government contributes approximately 50 percent.
U.S. contributions to ICRC's regional appeals are described under the previous regional sections of this document.
Assistance and Protection Programs These funds will support activities of international and non-governmental organizations that do not appear in any specific regional program (e.g., centrally funded multiregional activities) or that support the ability of organizations to respond to new requirements, including emergency response capacity.
Multiregional program activities include interagency coordination efforts, emergency response units of international organizations, and special studies.
These funds also will be used to support efforts to integrate the special needs of refugee women and children in the program and budget planning process of the international organizations and nongovernmental agencies engaged in providing refugee assistance overseas.
The multiregional program also supports two-year positions held by Americans with UNHCR, IOM and WFP, through Junior Professional Officer programs.
The United States provides unearmarked funding to the UNHCR General Program (from which many of the above activities are funded) under this activity, in addition to the funds provided to UNHCR through region-specific allocations discussed previously in this request.
Migration Program Summary ($ in thousands)
Account MRA
FY 2000 Enacted* 16,000
FY 2001 Estimate* 16,600
FY 2002 Request 17,000
* Migration is a new Assistance category in FY 2002.
In previous years, Migration activities were included in the individual Regional and Multi-Regional financial plans.
Funds shown above for FY 2000 and FY 2001 are therefore also included in the previous program summaries of each of those Overseas Assistance categories.
International migration activities include cooperation with other governments and with international and non-governmental organizations to understand the root causes of migration, particularly at the regional level, and to encourage humane and effective migration management.
The International Organization for Migration (IOM) is the chief international organization through which our funds for migration activities are disbursed.
The proposed $17 million for migration activities in FY 2002 includes our annual assessed contribution to IOM.
As a member of IOM, as authorized in the Migration and Refugee Assistance Act of 1962, the United States pays a 29.95% assessment to the organization's administrative budget.
(The IOM assessed contribution is paid in Swiss francs, and the dollar amount will vary according to the exchange rate at the time of payment.)
One of our chief migration activities is participation in and support for multilateral migration dialogues.
Since 1996, we have been involved in the Regional Conference on Migration (RCM), a forum where eleven North and Central American governments (as well as the Dominican Republic) discuss and seek to cooperate on common migration challenges.
In FY 2001, the Bureau also fulfilled the U.S. commitment to serve as "Responsible Coordinator" in implementing the migrant worker initiative originating in the Santiago (Chile) Summit of the Americas Action Plan.
In addition, the U.S. participates in the "Intergovernmental Consultations on Asylum, Refugee, and Migration Policies in Europe, North America, and Australia" (IGC), an informal channel for senior and mid-level policy officials from the United States, Canada, Australia, and European countries to exchange views and share information.
In Africa, we support nascent migration dialogues among members of the Economic Community of West African States (ECOWAS), and among member states of the Southern African Development Community (SADC).
Migration and asylum also figure prominently as part of the dialogue on "Justice and Home Affairs" issues in the New Trans-Atlantic Agenda (NTA) between the United States and the European Union (EU).
Since FY 1998, PRM and the European Commission have cooperated on information campaigns to address the problem of trafficking in women.
In FY 2002, PRM will continue its efforts to advance cooperation with the EU member states and the European Commission on migration issues with a special focus on protection.
PRM has also supported efforts to develop effective and humane migration management systems in the Newly Independent States (NIS).
We helped fund the first major migration conference in the region and continue to back
projects aimed at addressing the many migration-related challenges in that part of the world.
Finally, assistance in this category will be provided to migrants in pilot projects to support the international migration policy goals for which PRM has primary responsibility, especially the promotion of the human rights of vulnerable migrants, including asylum seekers and victims of trafficking.
MRA funds will be closely coordinated with other USG anti-trafficking programming, including work done by law enforcement entities.
Refugee Admissions Program Summary ($ in thousands) Account MRA FY 2000 Enacted 92,900 FY 2001 Estimate 109,854 FY 2002 Request 130,000
The Administration requests $130,000,000 to support the Refugee Admissions program in FY 2002.
This level is an increase of $20,146,000 over the FY 2001 enacted level, reflecting a grant increase in our Reception and Placement program and the fact that $14,700,000 appropriated in FY 2000 was available in FY 2001.
This request will support a level of admissions similar to that in FY 2000 and FY 2001.
The President, following the annual consultation process with Congress later in FY 2001, will determine the FY 2002 number of refugee admissions and the regional allocations.
The specific regional ceilings established in the consultations process will be based on an assessment of worldwide refugee needs at that time.
The request funds all related refugee admissions activities and the processing and transportation of a small number of Amerasian Immigrants.
In FY 2002, PRM will continue to give priority to enhancing accessibility to the refugee admissions program for individuals in need of the protection afforded by resettlement and to enhancing the quality of the initial resettlement services received by each arriving refugee.
Actual U.S. refugee admissions for FY 2000 and the established FY 2001 ceilings are shown in the table below: Geographic Region Africa East Asia Europe Latin America/Caribbean Near East/South Asia Unallocated TOTAL ­ FUNDED FY 2000 Actual 17,554 4,561 37,467 3,233 10,117 72,932 FY 2001 Ceiling 20,000 6,000 37,000 3,000 10,000 4,000 80,000
Africa Admissions of African refugees increased approximately 35 percent in FY 2000 from 13,000 to 17,554 refugees.
African refugees of any nationality who are referred for resettlement for protection or durable solution reasons by UNHCR or a U.S. Embassy will be processed.
Several specific groups have been identified as of special humanitarian concern and will be eligible for direct registration.
In addition, refugees from some countries undergoing active or recently concluded armed conflict will be eligible for
family reunification processing.
In FY 2001, some of the largest populations are expected to be Sudanese, Sierra Leoneans, and Somalis.
East Asia ODP, ROVR, and Amerasians - For 20 years under the Orderly Departure Program (ODP) from Vietnam, refugee cases were processed for those with close ties to the United States, with particular emphasis on former re-education center detainees and Amerasians.
In addition, since FY 1997 the U.S. has processed for refugee admission some 19,000 Vietnamese applicants under the Resettlement Opportunity for Vietnamese Returnees (ROVR).
In FY 2002, we expect to complete residual caseloads as well as to address the needs of Vietnamese protection cases.
First Asylum - In FY 2002 it is expected that small numbers of Burmese and refugees from other Asian countries may also be processed.
Europe The FY 2002 program will primarily include persons from the former Soviet Union, persons from the Republics of the former Yugoslavia, and a small residual population of qualifying family member (Visas 93) beneficiaries from East European countries.
Admissions from the former Soviet Union will be primarily persons of special interest to the United States.
These include Jews, Evangelical Christians, and certain Ukrainian religious activists.
The Department of State will continue to closely monitor the situation of religious minorities in Russia.
Admissions from the former Yugoslavia will emphasize vulnerable cases, and other refugees for whom reintegration is not a viable option.
Near East and South Asia In FY 2002, admissions of Iranians (primarily religious minorities) and Iraqis are expected to continue and the admission of vulnerable Afghans -- particularly women and certain ethnic minorities -- is expected to increase.
Latin America and the Caribbean Western Hemisphere program efforts in this region primarily support the admission of Cubans.
The in-country Cuban refugee processing program is designed to allow those individuals most likely to qualify as refugees, the opportunity to have their claims heard without resorting to dangerous boat departures.
Nationals of other countries, such as Colombia, will be considered if referred by UNHCR.
SUMMARY OF COSTS The total cost of all admissions activities to be covered from appropriated funds in FY 2002 is estimated at $130,000,000.
The requested funds are directly related to costs
incurred on behalf of refugees whose actual admission will occur in FY 2002 or in 2003.
After a refugee is approved by the Immigration and Naturalization Service (INS) for the U.S. refugee admissions program, the refugee receives a medical examination, sponsorship in the United States is assured, travel arrangements are prepared, and all other steps necessary for admission to the United States are completed.
Most transportation and Reception and Placement grant costs are incurred when the refugee departs the asylum country for resettlement in the United States.
Funds also are used to support all ongoing activities related to admissions, such as case identification and prescreening of refugee applicants, processing of applicant case files, medical examinations, and overseas orientation.
The budget request for refugee admissions funds the programs described below.
Funds may also be used for the evaluation of these programs.
Amerasian Admissions Costs Within the total admissions request, sufficient funds have been included to cover the admissions costs of Amerasian immigrants and their qualifying family members.
These funds are included within the category requests that follow, but are not separately identified by activity.
The small number of Amerasian immigrants who enter under the provisions of Section 584 of the FY 1988 Further Continuing Resolution to the Appropriations Act, P.L.100-202, receive the same services provided to refugees.
Processing The Depart ment funds a number of private voluntary agencies and the International Organization for Migration to assist with the processing of refugees worldwide for resettlement in the United States.
Processing responsibilities include screening applicants to assess their eligibility for interview by INS adjudicators under the U.S. refugee program.
Some applicants interviewed by INS are not approved for U.S. resettlement.
Therefore, more cases are processed during the course of the year than will actually be admitted to the United States as refugees.
For approved refugees, processing funds also are used to pay for medical examinations, cultural orientation materials and briefings, and required travel documentation.
In addition to overseas processing operations, the Department funds certain services performed in the United States that are essential to the smooth and efficient operation of the admissions process.
This includes maintaining an U.S.-based Refugee Data Center, which operates a case allocation and a Reception and Placement (R
The computerized Worldwide Refugee Admissions Processing System (WRAPS) will be deployed in FY 2002, streamlining all aspects of refugee processing.
Transportation and Related Services In FY 2002, the Ad ministration requests funds for transportation and related services provided by IOM in support of the U.S. admissions program.
This activity includes
funding for international and domestic airfares, IOM operational support, communications, and transit accommodations where required.
The cost of the airfares is provided to refugees on a loan basis; beneficiaries are responsible for repaying their loans over time after resettlement.
Therefore, the requirement for appropriated funds for refugee transportation, in any given year is partially offset by loan repayments to IOM from refugees previously resettled.
In addition, some refugees, primarily from the former Soviet Union, elect to travel on privately purchased tickets.
Reception and Placement Grants Through the Department's Reception and Placement program (R
These agencies augment the federal grant by drawing on private cash and in-kind contributions that are essential to the success of this program.
Services include pre-arrival planning, reception at the airport, initial housing, orientation to their communities, counseling, and referral to local social service programs.
In an effort to strengthen program oversight and improve the quality of services provided to refugees, the Department has recently developed "Standards of Care" which better define the R
The Department is also exploring ways to expand its program monitoring efforts.
The Department coordinates its reception and placement services with the refugee assistance programs administered by the Office of Refugee Resettlement in the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS/ORR).
Refugees to Israel Program Summary ($ in thousands)
Account MRA
FY 2000 Enacted 60,000
FY 2001 Estimate 59,868
FY 2002 Request 60,000
The FY 2002 request includes $60,000,000 to support resettlement in Israel through a grant to the United Israel Appeal (UIA).
This grant helps finance programs of the Jewish Agency for Israel that assist in the absorption into Israeli society of Jewish humanitarian migrants coming to Israel from the former Soviet Union and certain countries of distress.
In 1991, approximately 145,000 individuals from the former Soviet Union arrived in Israel; by 2000, this number had declined to approximately 51,000.
Administrative Expenses Program Summary ($ in thousands) Account MRA FY 2000 Enacted Positions Funds 110 13,800 FY 2001 Estimate Positions Funds 112 14,468 FY 2002 Request Positions Funds 112 16,000
The FY 2002 request of $16,000,000 for administrative expenses is an increase of $1,532,000 from the FY 2001 estimate.
The requested increase will fund full year support costs of several refugee coordinator positions to be filled by the end of FY 2001 ($721,000) and International Cooperative Agreement Support Services (ICASS) System costs associated with same new positions ($180,000).
In addition the increase is needed to fund domestic and overseas wage increases ($430,900) and historical increases for ICASS ($200,000).
The FY 2002 request will finance the salaries and operating costs associated with a staff of 112 permanent positions in the Bureau of Population, Refugees, and Migration.
This staff, both overseas and domestic, manages the resources and array of issues for which PRM is responsible.
The overseas staff manages important humanitarian and refugee responsibilities.
Domestic staff direct diplomatic initiatives and policy development, address program design, monitor and evaluate operational activities, and maintain an equally important policy liaison role, supporting other parts of the State Department in integrating refugee and humanitarian issues into broader regional foreign policy concerns.
Costs related to a staff of five permanent positions dedicated to international population activities are included in the Department of State's Diplomatic and Consular Programs (D
The D
Requirements by Object Class ($ in thousands) Object Class Personnel compensation Personnel benefits Benefits for former personnel Travel and transportation of persons Travel and transportation of things Rents, communications, and utilities Printing and reproduction Other services Supplies and materials Personnel property Grants, subsidies, and contributions Appropriation Total FY 2000 Enacted 7,198 2,252 0 958 30 541 148 1,908 159 606 608,825 622,625 FY 2001 Estimate 7,941 2,356 0 1,119 11 559 139 2,046 138 159 683,992 698,460 FY 2002 Request 8,462 2,528 0 1,225 13 705 139 2,563 165 200 699,000 715,000
Emergency Refugee and Migration Assistance Fund Summary Statement ($ in thousands)
Account ERMA
FY 2000 Enacted 12,452
FY 2001 Estimate* 14,967
FY 2002 Request 15,000
*reflects an 0.22% rescission on the $15,000,000 original appropriation
The Emergenc y Refugee and Migration Assistance (ERMA) Fund is a no-year appropriation, drawn upon by the President to meet "unexpected urgent refugee and migration needs" whenever the President determines that it is "important to the national interest" to do so.
The Migration and Refugee Assistance Act of 1962, as amended, provides permanent authorization for the account of up to $100,000,000.
The Administration requests $15,000,000 for the ERMA Fund to provide the flexibility needed to respond to unexpected refugee and migration emergencies.
Program Activities
In FY 2000 and FY 2001, as of March 2001, a total of $95,000,000 was drawn down from the ERMA Fund for the following requirements: Africa
Presidential Determination 2001-05 - $5,000,000 On December 15, 2000, $5,000,000 was authorized to meet the urgent and unexpected needs of refugees, displaced persons, victims of conflict, and other persons at risk due to the crisis in Guinea.
Presidential Determination 2001-05 - $10,000,000 On December 15, 2000, $10,000,000 was authorized to meet the urgent and unexpected needs of refugees, displaced persons, victims of conflict, and other persons at risk due to the crisis in the Democratic Republic of the Congo.
East Asia
Presidential Determination 2000-07 - $30,000,000 On November 10, 1999, $30,000,000 was authorized to meet the urgent and unexpected needs of refugees, displaced persons, victims of conflict, and other persons at risk due to the Timor crisis.
Europe
Presidential Determination 2001-10 - $20,000,000 On January 17, 2001, $20,000,000 was authorized to meet the urgent and unexpected needs of refugees, displaced persons, victims of conflict, and other persons at risk in the Balkans.
Presidential Determination 2001-05 - $3,200,000 On December 15, 2000, $3,200,000 was authorized to meet the urgent and unexpected needs of refugees, displaced persons, victims of conflict, and other persons at risk in the North Caucasus.
Presidential Determination 2001-05 - $5,000,000 On December 15, 2000, $5,000,000 was authorized to meet the urgent and unexpected needs of refugees, displaced persons, victims of conflict, and other persons at risk in Serbia.
Presidential Determination 2000-07 - $10,000,000 On November 10, 1999, $10,000,000 was authorized to meet the urgent and unexpected needs of refugees, displaced persons, victims of conflict, and other persons at risk due to the North Caucasus crisis.
Near East
Presidential Determination 2001-05 - $8,800,000 On December 15, 2000, $8,800,000 was authorized to meet the urgent and unexpected needs of refugees, displaced persons, victims of conflict, and other persons at risk due to the crisis in the West Bank and Gaza.
South Asia
Presidential Determination 2001-10 - $2,000,000 On January 17, 2001, $2,000,000 was authorized to meet the urgent and unexpected needs of refugees, displaced persons, victims of conflict, and other persons at risk due to the crisis in Nepal.
Presidential Determination 2001-05 - $1,000,000 On December 15, 2000, $1,000,000 was authorized to meet the urgent and unexpected needs of refugees, displaced persons, victims of conflict, and other persons at risk due to the Afghan crisis.
Summary Statement ($ in thousands) Object Class Grants, subsidies, and contributions FY 2001 OPENING BALANCE 160,277 * FY 2002 Request 15,000
* Of which, $145,310,000 was carried forward from FY 2000 and $14,967,000 was appropriated in FY 2001.
Nonproliferation, Anti-Terrorism, Demining, and Related Programs ($ in thousands)
Program Nonproliferation 
FY 2000 Actual FY 2001 Estimate
FY 2002 Request
Export Control Assistance Science Centers1 IAEA Voluntary Contribution CTBT Preparatory Commission KEDO Nonproliferation Contingency Anti-terrorism Assistance Terrorist Interdiction Program Philippines CT Support Lockerbie Trial Support Humanitarian Demining Small Arms Destruction Total, NADR Program National Interests:
15,000 14,530 [59,000] 43,000 13,693 55,307 31,000 1,250 2,000 40,000 215,780
14,967 19,100 35,000 47,000 21,056 54,879 20,000 38,000 4,000 15,000 39,912 2,000 310,914
14,000 17,000 37,000 49,000 20,000 95,000 38,000 4,000 16,000 40,000 2,000 332,000
The Nonproliferation, Anti-terrorism, Demining, and Related Programs Account (NADR) funds critical, security-related programs in support of a broad range of U.S. national interests.
NADR programs serve as an important tool for working with foreign nations to reduce transnational threats to America's security, as well as to mitigate local threats that cause regional instabilities and humanitarian tragedies.
The FY 2002 request of $332 million reflects the funding needed to support U.S. efforts to reduce threats posed by international terrorist activities, landmines, and stockpiles of excess weapons, as well as by nuclear, chemical, and biological weapons, missiles, their associated technologies, and destabilizing conventional weapons.
Objectives 
The success or failure of the United States in dealing with problems in each of these areas will have implications for maintaining U.S. security and military superiority; efforts to promote reconciliation and stability in the Middle East, South Asia, and Northeast Asia; and access to critical resources and markets.
1
Science Centers funded from FREEDOM Support Act/NIS account in FY 2000.
Nonproliferation Efforts One of the most direct and serious security threats facing the United States is the possibility of conflict involving weapons of mass destruction (WMD).
The central nonproliferation challenge is to halt the clandestine spread of WMD materials and technology to rogue states, terrorist groups, and other non-state actors.
The FY 2002 NADR request funds bilateral and multilateral assistance programs which directly support U.S. nonproliferation objectives: To deny materials and technology to proliferators by containing Russia, China, and North Korea as suppliers ; To prevent and contain WMD and missile programs in key countries and regions including Iran, Iraq, Libya, North Korea and South Asia; To prevent the leakage of Cold War-era nuclear materials and expertise, primarily from the former Soviet Union; To strengthen international nonproliferation agreements and norms; and To ensure that peaceful nuclear cooperation serves safety, environmental, and nonproliferation goals.
NADR supports three nonproliferation programs on a direct bilateral or limited multilateral basis: the Nonproliferation and Disarmament Fund (NDF), a contingency fund for unanticipated requirements or opportunities; the Science Centers, which finance civilian research by former Soviet weapons experts in Russia, the Ukraine, and the other independent republics of the former Soviet Union; and Export Control Assistance, which is designed to strengthen national export control systems in key countries worldwide.
NADR funds also leverage other international donors in three multilateral fora.
Under the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA), the U.S. voluntary contribution supplements the IAEA's operating budget to implement strengthened nuclear safeguards measures and allow expansion in nuclear safety cooperation with key countries.
Funding for the International Monitoring System (IMS), which will collect worldwide data from seismic, hydroacoustic, infrasound, and radionuclide stations, will provide an important supplement to U.S. national capabilities for detecting and monitoring nuclear explosion testing.
The IMS is managed by the Comprehensive Nuclear-Test-Ban Treaty (CTBT) Preparatory Commission in Vienna.
Finally, the U.S. contribution to the Korean Peninsula Energy Development Organization (KEDO) supports implementation of the 1994 Agreed Framework between the United States and the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (DPRK).
U.S. assistance funds part of KEDO's administrative expenses and provides annual shipments of heavy fuel oil to the DPRK until completion of the first light water reactor, as stipulated in the Framework.
The Administration is reviewing U.S. policy on North Korea.
In the meantime, we will continue to abide by the Agreed Framework so long as North Korea does.
Anti-Terrorism Efforts The NADR account also supports a comprehensive approach to preventing and countering terrorist attacks on U.S. citizens and to minimize the impact of any attacks that may occur, whether at home or abroad.
NADR funds both the Antiterrorism Assistance (ATA) and Terrorist Interdiction Program (TIP), which provide technical training and equipment to assist foreign countries in protecting facilities, individuals, and infrastructure, as well as to prevent the transit of terrorists and their materials across borders.
The FY 2002 program will support ongoing core ATA programs and allow for expansion in selected regions, as well as support new TIP countries' efforts to interdict terrorists.
NADR funds also will be used in FY 2002 to support the incremental cost of holding in the Netherlands the trial for the 1988 bombing of Pan Am Flight 103 over Lockerbie, Scotland.
Regional Stability and Humanitarian Assistance Finally, the NADR account funds programs that promote an environment to allow for peace and regional stability, as well as meet humanitarian needs.
The Humanitarian Demining Program (HDP) supports demining and mine awareness efforts that allow mine-affected nations to protect innocent civilians, return displaced persons to their homes, rebuild shattered economic infrastructure, return agricultural land to productivity, and allow the safe delivery of other humanitarian services.
The principle means used to achieve these objectives is to build an indigenous capacity to execute and manage humanitarian mine action initiatives.
In FY 2002, NADR will also fund the second year of the Small Arms Destruction initiative, which is designed to eliminate Cold War-era surplus small arms and light weapons in Eastern Europe and the former Soviet Union, and post-conflict stockpiles, mainly in Latin America and Sub-Saharan Africa.
As with the Humanitarian Demining Program, the Small Arms Destruction initiative promotes regional s tability and minimizes threats to civilian populations by destroying weapons that fuel the international illicit arms market, in turn exacerbating regional and civil conflicts and claiming thousands of lives and displacing large numbers of civilians every year.
Individual NADR program justifications are found in the Global Programs section; KEDO and the Science Centers justifications are located in the East Asia 
DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY
Treasury Technical Assistance Debt Restructuring Program
This page intentionally left blank.
Treasury Technical Assistance
Detailed justification not available at time of publication.
See Justification in the Department of the Treasury's FY 2002 budget submission.
Debt Restructuring
Detailed justification not available at time of publication.
See Justification in the Department of the Treasury's FY 2002 budget submission.
